Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.19191

Surplus computers and computer-related equipment—Donation to school districts or educational service districts.

(1) In addition to disposing of property under RCW 28A.335.180, 39.33.010, 43.19.1919, and 43.19.1920, state-owned, surplus computers and computer-related equipment may be donated to any school district or educational service district under the guidelines and distribution standards established pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(2) The department and office of the superintendent of public instruction shall jointly develop guidelines and distribution standards for the donation of state-owned, surplus computers and computer-related equipment to school districts and educational service districts. The guidelines and distribution standards shall include considerations for quality, school-district needs, and accountability, and shall give priority to meeting the computer-related needs of children with disabilities, including those disabilities necessitating the portability of laptop computers. The guidelines must be updated as needed.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 216; 1999 c 186 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.